src/morphology/affixes/commons.lexc
! Possessive/Optional implies Clitic/Optional
LEXICON Possessive/Optional
	Possessive/Obligatory	;
	Clitic/Optional	;
	Ennd	;

LEXICON Possessive/Obligatory
+PxSg1:{←n~}ni	Clitic/Optional		;
+PxSg2:{←n~}si	Clitic/Optional		;
+PxSg3:{←n~}ns{aä}	Clitic/Optional		;
+PxPl1:{←n~}mme	Clitic/Optional		;
+PxPl2:{←n~}nne	Clitic/Optional		;
+PxPl3:{←n~}ns{aä}	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON Possessive/Vn
+PxSg3:{←n~}{aeiouyäö}n	Clitic/Optional		;
+PxPl3:{←n~}{aeiouyäö}n	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON Possessive/Optional+Vn
	Possessive/Optional	;
	Possessive/Vn	;

LEXICON Possessive/Obligatory+Vn
	Possessive/Obligatory	;
	Possessive/Vn	;

LEXICON Clitic/Optional
	Clitic/Obligatory	;
	Ennd	;

LEXICON Clitic/Optional/Neg
	Clitic/Optional/Neg	;
	Ennd	;

LEXICON Clitic/Obligatory
	Clitic/Obligatory/Rest	;
	Clitic/Obligatory/Neg	;

LEXICON Clitic/Obligatory/Neg
+han:h{aä}n	Ennd		;
+han+kaan:h{aä}nk{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
+han+ko:h{aä}nk{oö}	Ennd		;
+han+pa:h{aä}np{aä}	Ennd		;
+ko:k{oö}	Ennd		;
+ko+han:k{oö}h{aä}n	Ennd		;
+ko+kaan:k{oö}k{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
+ko+kin:k{oö}kin	Ennd		;
+ko+pa:k{oö}p{aä}	Ennd		;
+ko+s:k{oö}s	Ennd		;
+ko+Use/Sub+s:{←t~}ks	Ennd		;
+pa:p{aä}	Ennd		;
+pa+han:p{aä}h{aä}n	Ennd		;
+pa+kaan:p{aä}k{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
+pa+kin:p{aä}kin	Ennd		;
+pa+ko:p{aä}k{oö}	Ennd		;
+pa+s:p{aä}s	Ennd		;

LEXICON Clitic/Obligatory/Rest
+kin:kin	Ennd		;
+kin+han:kinh{aä}n	Ennd		;
+kin+kaan:kink{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
+kin+ko:kink{oö}	Ennd		;
+kin+pa:kinp{aä}	Ennd		;
+kaan:k{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
+kaan+han:k{aä}{aä}nh{aä}n	Ennd		;
+kaan+kin:k{aä}{aä}nkin	Ennd		;
+kaan+ko:k{aä}{aä}nk{oö}	Ennd		;
+kaan+pa:k{aä}{aä}np{aä}	Ennd		;


LEXICON Particle+Clitic/Optional
    Clitic/Optional ;

LEXICON Adverb+Clitic/Optional
    Clitic/Optional ;

LEXICON Adposition+Clitic/Optional
    Clitic/Optional ;
